Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202214-568
Municipal bidding procedure; waiver; when.

Notwithstanding any home rule charter or statutory provisions or restrictions, any municipal bidding procedure may be waived by the city council of a city of the metropolitan class when required to comply with any federal grant, loan, or program.

Laws 2011, LB335, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 213.
July 21, 2022